Florida, session 2026, SB718.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 373.027, Florida Statutes, is created to 19 read: 20 373.027âWater management preemption.â 21 (1)âA county or municipality may not adopt laws, 22 regulations, rules, or policies relating to any of the 23 following: 24 (a)âWater quality. 25 (b)âWater quantity. 26 (c)âPollution control. 27 (d)âPollutant discharge prevention or removal. 28 (e)âWetlands, including any delineation. 29 (2)âThe regulation of water quality, water quantity, 30 pollution control, pollutant discharge prevention and removal, 31 and wetlands, including any delineation, is exclusively 32 preempted to the state. 33 (3)âThis section does not: 34 (a)âApply to an interagency or interlocal agreement between 35 the department and any agency, water management district, or 36 local government conducting programs relating to or materially 37 affecting the water resources of the state. 38 (b)âAffect the authority of a county or municipality to 39 regulate and operate its own water system, wastewater system, or 40 stormwater system. 41 (4)âIf the department determines that a county or 42 municipality is in violation of this section, the department 43 shall notify the Chief Financial Officer of the violation, and 44 the Chief Financial Officer shall withhold any state funds to 45 which the county or municipality may be entitled. 46 Section 2.âSection 373.591, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 47 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.